en: Body gels
de: Körpergels, Körpergel
es: Geles corporales, Gel corporal
fr: Gels pour le corps, Gel pour le corps, Gels corporels
it: Gel corpo
nl: Lichaamsgels, Lichaamsgel
pt: Géis corporais, Gel corporal

en: Slimming gels, Anti-cellulite gels
fr: Gel Amincissant

en: Massage gels
fr: Gel de massage

en: Body powders
de: Körperpuder
es: Polvos corporales, Polvo corporal
fr: Poudres pour le corps, poudres corporelles, Poudre pour le corps, Poudre corporelle
it: Polveri corpo, Polvere per il corpo
nl: Lichaamspoeders, Lichaamspoeder
pt: Pós corporais, Pó corporal

en: Body scrubs, body exfoliants
de: Körperpeelings, Körperpeeling
es: Exfoliantes corporales, Exfoliante corporal
fr: Gommages pour le corps, Gommages corporels, Gommage pour le corps, Gommage corporel
it: Scrub corpo, Esfolianti corpo
nl: Lichaamsscrubs, Lichaamsscrub
pt: Esfoliantes corporais, Esfoliante corporal

en: Leg care products, Leg care
ar: العناية بالساقين
az: Ayaq baxımı
bg: Грижа за краката
bn: পায়ের যত্ন
ca: Cura de les cames
cs: Péče o nohy
da: Benpleje
de: Beine Pflege
el: Φροντίδα ποδιών
es: Cuidado de las piernas
et: Jalgade hooldus
fa: مراقبت از پا
fi: Jalkojen hoito
fr: Soins pour les jambes, Soin pour les jambes
ga: Cúram cos
he: טיפוח רגליים
hr: Njega stopala
hu: Lábápolás
hy: Ոտքերի խնամք
id: Perawatan kaki
is: Fótaaðgát
it: Cura delle gambe
ja: 脚のケア
ka: ფეხის მოვლა
kk: Аяқ күтімі
km: ការថែរក្សាជើង
ko: 다리 관리
ky: Бутту күтүү
lt: Kojų priežiūra
lv: Kāju kopšana
mk: Нега на нозете
ms: Penjagaan kaki
mt: Kura tas-saqajn
nl: Beenverzorging
no: Benpleie
pl: Pielęgnacja nóg
pt: Cuidados com as pernas
ro: Îngrijirea picioarelor
ru: Уход за ногами
sk: Starostlivosť o nohy
sl: Nega stopal
sq: Kujdesi i këmbëve
sr: Нега стопала
sv: Benvård
sw: Utunzaji wa miguu
tg: Нигоҳубини пойҳо
th: การดูแลขา
tk: Aýak idegi
tr: Bacak bakımı
uk: Догляд за ногами
ur: ٹانگوں کی دیکھ بھال
uz: Oyoq parvarishi
vi: Chăm sóc chân
zh: 腿部护理

en: Bust, Bust care
fr: Buste, Soins du buste, Soin du buste

en: Hand creams
ar: كريمات اليد
az: Əl kremləri
bg: Кремове за ръце
cs: Krémy na ruce
da: Håndcremer
de: Handcremes
el: Κρέμες χεριών
es: Cremas de manos
et: Kätekreemid
fa: کرم دست
fi: Käsivoiteet
fr: Crèmes pour les mains, Crème pour les mains, crèmes mains, crème mains
ga: Uachtair láimhe
hr: Kreme za ruke
hu: Kézkrémek
hy: Ձեռքի կրեմներ
id: Krim tangan
is: Handáburður
it: Creme per le mani
ja: ハンドクリーム
ka: ხელის კრემები
kk: Қолға арналған кремдер
ko: 핸드 크림
ky: Кол кремдери
lt: Rankų kremai
lv: Roku krēmi
mk: Креми за раце
ms: Krim tangan
mt: Kremi tal-idejn
nl: Handcrèmes
no: Håndkremer
pl: Kremy do rąk
pt: Cremes para as mãos
ro: Creme de mâini
ru: Кремы для рук
sk: Krémy na ruky
sl: Kreme za roke
sq: Krema për duar
sr: Креме за руке
sv: Handkrämer
sw: Losheni za mikono
tg: Кремҳои дастӣ
th: ครีมทามือ
tk: El kremleri
tr: El kremleri
uk: Креми для рук
uz: Qo'l kremlari
vi: Kem dưỡng da tay
zh: 护手霜

en: Face
da: Ansigt
fr: Visage
nl: Gezicht
sv: Ansikte

en: Facial creams, face creams
ar: كريمات للوجه
az: Üz kremləri
bg: Кремове за лице
bn: মুখের ক্রিম
ca: Cremes facials
cs: Pleťové krémy
da: Ansigtscremer
de: Gesichtscremes
el: Κρέμες προσώπου
es: Cremas faciales
et: Näokreemid
fa: کرم های صورت
fi: Kasvovoiteet
fr: Crèmes pour le visage, Crème pour le visage, crèmes visage, crème visage
ga: Uachtair facial
he: קרמי פנים
hr: Kreme za lice
hu: Arckrémek
hy: Դեմքի կրեմներ
id: Krim wajah
is: Andlitskrem
it: Creme per il viso
ja: フェイシャルクリーム
ka: სახის კრემები
kk: Бетке арналған кремдер
km: ក្រែមលាបមុខ
ko: 얼굴 크림
ky: Бет креми
lt: Veido kremai
lv: Sejas krēmi
mk: Креми за лице
ms: Krim muka
mt: Kremi tal-wiċċ
nl: Gezichtscrèmes
no: Ansiktskremer
pl: Kremy do twarzy
pt: Cremes faciais
ro: Creme de față
ru: Кремы для лица
sk: Pleťové krémy
sl: Kreme za obraz
sq: Krema për fytyrën
sr: Креме за лице
sv: Ansiktskrämer
sw: Losheni za uso
tg: Кремҳои рӯй
th: ครีมทาหน้า
tk: Ýüz kremleri
tr: Yüz kremleri
uk: Креми для обличчя
ur: چہرے کی کریمیں
uz: Yuz kremlari
vi: Kem dưỡng da mặt
zh: 面霜

en: Day creams
ar: كريمات النهار
az: Gündüz kremləri
bg: Дневни кремове
cs: Denní krémy
da: Dagcremer
de: Tagescremes
el: Κρέμες ημέρας
es: Cremas de día
et: Päevakreemid
fa: کرم های روز
fi: Päivävoiteet
fr: Crèmes de jour, Crème de jour
ga: Uachtair lae
hr: Dnevne kreme
hu: Nappali krémek
hy: Ցերեկային կրեմներ
id: Krim siang
is: Dagkrem
it: Creme da giorno
ja: デイクリーム
ka: დღის კრემები
kk: Күндізгі кремдер
ko: 데이 크림
ky: Күндүзгү кремдер
lt: Dieniniai kremai
lv: Dienas krēmi
mk: Дневни креми
ms: Krim siang
mt: Kremi ta' matul il-jum
nl: Dagcrèmes
no: Dagkremer
pl: Kremy na dzień
pt: Cremes de dia
ro: Creme de zi
ru: Дневные кремы
sk: Denné krémy
sl: Dnevne kreme
sq: Krema dite
sr: Дневне креме
sv: Dagkrämer
sw: Losheni za mchana
tg: Кремҳои рӯзона
th: เดย์ครีม
tk: Gündiz kremleri
tr: Gündüz kremleri
uk: Денні креми
uz: Kunduzgi kremlar
vi: Kem dưỡng da ban ngày
zh: 日霜

en: Night creams
ar: كريمات ليلية
az: Gecə kremləri
bg: Нощни кремове
cs: Noční krémy
da: Natcremer
de: Nachtcremes
el: Κρέμες νύχτας
es: Cremas de noche
et: Öökreemid
fa: کرم های شب
fi: Yövoiteet
fr: Crèmes de nuit, Crème de nuit, Soin de nuit
ga: Uachtair oíche
hr: Noćne kreme
hu: Éjszakai krémek
hy: Գիշերային կրեմներ
id: Krim malam
is: Næturkrem
it: Creme da notte
ja: ナイトクリーム
ka: ღამის კრემები
kk: Түнгі кремдер
ko: 나이트 크림
ky: Түнкү кремдер
lt: Naktiniai kremai
lv: Nakts krēmi
mk: Ноќни креми
ms: Krim malam
mt: Kremi ta' bil-lejl
nl: Nachtcrèmes
no: Nattkremer
pl: Kremy na noc
pt: Cremes noturnos
ro: Creme de noapte
ru: Ночные кремы
sk: Nočné krémy
sl: Nočne kreme
sq: Krema nate
sr: Ноћне креме
sv: Nattkrämer
sw: Losheni za usiku
tg: Кремҳои шабона
th: ไนท์ครีม
tk: Gijeki kremler
tr: Gece kremleri
uk: Нічні креми
uz: Tunik kremlar
vi: Kem đêm
zh: 晚霜

en: Day and night creams
ar: كريمات النهار والليل
az: Gündüz və gecə kremləri
bg: Дневни и нощни кремове
bn: দিন ও রাতের ক্রিম
ca: Cremes de dia i de nit
cs: Denní a noční krémy
da: Dag- og natcremer
de: Tages- und Nachtcremes
el: Κρέμες ημέρας και νύχτας
es: Cremas de día y de noche
et: Päeva- ja öökreemid
fa: کرم های روز و شب
fi: Päivä- ja yövoiteet
fr: Crèmes jour et nuit, Crème jour et nuit, Soin jour et nuit
ga: Uachtair lae agus oíche
he: קרמי יום ולילה
hr: Dnevne i noćne kreme
hu: Nappali és éjszakai krémek
hy: Ցերեկային և գիշերային կրեմներ
id: Krim siang dan malam
is: Dag- og næturkrem
it: Creme giorno e notte
ja: デイ＆ナイトクリーム
ka: დღისა და ღამის კრემები
kk: Күндізгі және түнгі кремдер
km: ក្រែមថ្ងៃនិងយប់
ko: 데이 앤 나이트 크림
ky: Күндүзгү жана түнкү кремдер
lt: Dieniniai ir naktiniai kremai
lv: Dienas un nakts krēmi
mk: Дневни и ноќни креми
ms: Krim siang dan malam
mt: Kremi ta' nhar u ta' billejl
nl: Dag- en nachtcrèmes
no: Dag- og nattkremer
pl: Kremy na dzień i na noc
pt: Cremes de dia e de noite
ro: Creme de zi și de noapte
ru: Дневные и ночные кремы
sk: Denné a nočné krémy
sl: Dnevne in nočne kreme
sq: Krema dite dhe nate
sr: Дневне и ноћне креме
sv: Dag- och nattkrämer
sw: Krimu za mchana na usiku
tg: Кремҳои рӯзона ва шабона
th: ครีมบำรุงผิวหน้ากลางวันและกลางคืน
tk: Gündiz we gije kremleri
tr: Gündüz ve gece kremleri
uk: Денні та нічні креми
ur: دن اور رات کی کریمیں
uz: Kunduzgi va tungi kremlar
vi: Kem ngày và đêm
zh: 日霜和晚霜

en: Anti-aging face care products
de: Anti-Aging-Gesichtspflege, Anti-Aging
es: Productos antienvejecimiento, Cuidado antiedad
fr: Soins anti-âge visage, Soin anti-âge visage, Crème anti-âge visage
it: Prodotti antietà, Trattamenti antietà
nl: Anti-aging gezichtsverzorging
pt: Produtos antienvelhecimento, Cuidado antienvelhecimento

en: Anti-wrinkles creams
ar: كريمات مضادة للتجاعيد
az: Qırışlara qarşı kremlər
bg: Кремове против бръчки
cs: Krémy proti vráskám
da: Anti-rynkecremer
de: Anti-Falten-Cremes
el: Κρέμες κατά των ρυτίδων
es: Cremas antiarrugas
et: Kortsudevastased kreemid
fa: کرم های ضد چروک
fi: Ryppyvoiteet
fr: Crèmes anti-rides, Crème anti-rides, Soins anti-rides
ga: Uachtair frithroctha
hr: Kreme protiv bora
hu: Ránctalanító krémek
hy: Կնճիռների դեմ կրեմներ
id: Krim anti kerut
is: Hrukkuvarnarkrem
it: Creme antirughe
ja: しわ防止クリーム
ka: ნაოჭების საწინააღმდეგო კრემები
kk: Әжімге қарсы кремдер
ko: 주름 방지 크림
ky: Бырышка каршы кремдер
lt: Kremai nuo raukšlių
lv: Pretmīmikas krēmi
mk: Креми против брчки
ms: Krim anti kedut
mt: Kremi kontra t-tikmix
nl: Anti-rimpelcrèmes
no: Anti-rynkekremer
pl: Kremy przeciwzmarszczkowe
pt: Cremes anti-rugas
ro: Creme anti-rid
ru: Кремы против морщин
sk: Krémy proti vráskam
sl: Kreme proti gubam
sq: Krema kundër rrudhave
sr: Креме против бора
sv: Anti-rynkkrämer
sw: Krimu za kuzuia mikunjo
tg: Кремҳои зидди узвҳо
th: ครีมลดเลือนริ้วรอย
tk: Gyrmyza garşy kremler
tr: Kırışıklık karşıtı kremler
uk: Креми проти зморшок
uz: Ajinlarga qarshi kremlar
vi: Kem chống nhăn
zh: 抗皱霜

en: Eye contour creams, Eye creams
de: Augencremes, Augenpflege
es: Cremas para el contorno de ojos, Cremas para los ojos
fr: Contours des yeux
it: Creme contorno occhi, Creme occhi
nl: Oogcrèmes, Oogcontourcrèmes
pt: Cremes de contorno de olhos, Cremes para os olhos

en: Face scrubs, face exfoliants, facial exfoliants
de: Gesichtspeelings, Gesichtspeeling
es: Exfoliantes faciales, Exfoliante facial
fr: Gommages visage, Gommage visage
it: Scrub viso, Esfolianti viso
nl: Gezichtsscrubs, Gezichtsscrub
pt: Esfoliantes faciais, Esfoliante facial

en: Face masks
ar: أقنعة الوجه
az: Üz maskaları
bg: Маски за лице
bn: মুখের মাস্ক
ca: Màscares facials
cs: Pleťové masky
da: Ansigtsmasker
de: Gesichtsmasken
el: Μάσκες προσώπου
es: Mascarillas faciales
et: Näomaskid
fa: ماسک صورت
fi: Kasvonaamiot
fr: Masques visage, Masque visage
ga: Mascanna aghaidhe
he: מסכות פנים
hr: Maske za lice
hu: Arcmaszkok
hy: Դիմակի դիմակներ
id: Masker wajah
is: Andlitsmaskar
it: Maschere per il viso
ja: フェイスマスク
ka: სახის ნიღბები
kk: Бет маскалары
km: ម៉ាសបិទមុខ
ko: 마스크팩
ky: Бет маскалары
lt: Veido kaukės
lv: Sejas maskas
mk: Маски за лице
ms: Topeng muka
mt: Maskri tal-wiċċ
nl: Gezichtmasker, gezichtmaskers
no: Ansiktsmasker
pl: Maseczki do twarzy
pt: Máscaras faciais
ro: Măști de față
ru: Маски для лица
sk: Pleťové masky
sl: Maske za obraz
sq: Maskë fytyre
sr: Маске за лице
sv: Ansiktsmasker
sw: Maski za uso
tg: Ниқобҳои рӯй
th: มาส์กหน้า
tk: Ýüz maskalary
tr: Yüz maskeleri
uk: Маски для обличчя
ur: چہرے کے ماسک
uz: Yuz maskalari
vi: Mặt nạ
zh: 面膜

en: Lip balms, lip cares
ar: مرطبات شفاه
az: Dodaq balzamları
bg: Балсами за устни
bn: লিপ বাম, লিপ কেয়ার
ca: Bàlsams labials
cs: Balzámy na rty
da: Læbepomader, Læbebalsam
de: Lippenpflegestifte, Lippenschutzstifte, Lippenpflegestift, Lippenbalsam
el: Βάλσαμα για χείλη
es: Bálsamos labiales, Bálsamo labial
et: Huulepalsamid
fa: بالم لب
fi: Huulivoiteet, Huulivoide
fr: Baumes à lèvres, Baume à lèvres, Soins des lèvres, Soin des lèvres, Soin à lèvres, Soins à lèvres, Baumes lèvres
ga: Balm liopaí
he: משחות שפתיים
hr: Balzami za usne
hu: Ajakbalzsamok
hy: Շրթունքի բալզամներ
id: Pelembap bibir
is: Varasalvar
it: Balsami per labbra, Balsamo per le labbra
ja: リップクリーム
ka: ტუჩის ბალზამები
kk: Ерін бальзамдары
km: ក្រែមលាបមាត់
ko: 립밤
ky: Эрин бальзамдары
lt: Lūpų balzamai
lv: Lūpu balzami
mk: Балсами за усни
ms: Balm bibir
mt: Balzmi tax-xufftejn
nb: Leppepomader, Leppepomade
nl: Lippenbalsem
pl: Balsamy do ust, Balsam do ust
pt: Bálsamos labiais, Bálsamo de lábios
ro: Balsamuri de buze
ru: Бальзамы для губ
sk: Balzamy na pery
sl: Balzami za ustnice
sq: Balsame për buzë
sr: Балзами за усне
sv: Läppbalsam
sw: Mafuta ya midomo
tg: Балзамҳои лаб
th: ลิปบาล์ม
tk: Dodak melhemleri
tr: Dudak balmları
uk: Бальзами для губ
ur: ہونٹ بام
uz: Lab balzamlari
vi: Son dưỡng môi
zh: 润唇膏

en: Cleansers, makeup removers
ar: منظفات ، مزيلات المكياج
az: Təmizləyicilər, makiyaj təmizləyiciləri
bg: Почистващи препарати, препарати за премахване на грим
bn: ক্লিনজার, মেকআপ রিমুভার
ca: Netegadors, desmaquillants
cs: Čisticí prostředky, odličovače
da: Rensemidler, makeupfjernere
de: Reiniger, Make-up-Entferner
el: Καθαριστικά, ντεμακιγιάζ
es: Limpiadores, desmaquillantes
et: Puhastusvahendid, meigieemaldajad
fa: پاک کننده ها، پاک کننده های آرایش
fi: Puhdistusaineet, meikinpoistoaineet
fr: Démaquillants
ga: Glantóirí, bainisteoirí smididh
he: תכשירי ניקוי, מסיר איפור
hr: Sredstva za čišćenje, sredstva za uklanjanje šminke
hu: Arctisztítók, sminklemosók
hy: Մաքրող միջոցներ, դիմահարդարման հեռացնող միջոցներ
id: Pembersih, penghapus riasan
is: Hreinsiefni, förðunarfjarlægir
it: Detergenti, struccanti
ja: クレンザー、メーク落とし
ka: გამწმენდი საშუალებები, მაკიაჟის მოსაშორებელი საშუალებები
kk: Тазалағыштар, макияж тазалағыштар
km: សារធាតុសម្អាត, ឧបករណ៍ដកគ្រឿងសម្អាង
ko: 클렌저, 메이크업 리무버
ky: Тазалоочу каражаттар, макияжды тазалоочу каражаттар
lt: Valikliai, makiažo valikliai
lv: Attīrīšanas līdzekļi, kosmētikas noņēmēji
mk: Средства за чистење, отстранувачи на шминка
ms: Pembersih, penanggal solekan
mt: Cleaners, removers tal-make-up
nl: Reinigers, make-up removers
no: Rensemidler, sminkefjernere
pl: Oczyszczacze, zmywacze do makijażu
pt: Produtos de limpeza, removedores de maquiagem
ro: Demachiante
ru: Очищающие средства, средства для снятия макияжа
sk: Čistiace prostriedky, odličovače
sl: Čistila, odstranjevalci ličil
sq: Pastrues, heqës të grimit
sr: Средства за чишћење, средства за уклањање шминке
sv: Rengöringsmedel, sminkborttagare
sw: Visafishaji, viondoa vipodozi
tg: Тозакунакҳо, тозакунакҳои ороиш
th: คลีนเซอร์, ที่ล้างเครื่องสำอาง
tk: Arassalaýjylar, makýaž arassalaýjylar
tr: Temizleyiciler, makyaj temizleyicileri
uk: Засоби для чищення, засоби для зняття макіяжу
ur: صاف کرنے والے، میک اپ ہٹانے والے
uz: Tozalovchilar, makiyaj tozalovchilar
zh: 洁面乳，卸妆液